Florida, session 2026, SB1648.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 79 80 Section 1.âSection 409.9775, Florida Statutes, is created 81 to read: 82 409.9775âApplied behavior analysis services.â 83 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 84 (a)ââApplied behavior analysisâ means the design, 85 implementation, and evaluation of environmental modifications, 86 using behavioral stimuli and consequences, to produce socially 87 significant improvements in human behavior, including, but not 88 limited to, the use of direct observation, measurement, and 89 functional analysis of the relations between environment and 90 behavior. 91 (b)ââContinuity of careâ means the uninterrupted provision 92 of authorized medically necessary services during transitions in 93 coverage, provider status, or plan enrollment. 94 (c)ââMoratoriumâ means any temporary or indefinite 95 suspension of the enrollment or activation of new or existing 96 applied behavior analysis service providers by a managed care 97 plan. 98 (d)ââProviderâ means an individual or entity enrolled or 99 seeking enrollment to provide applied behavior analysis 100 services, including board-certified behavior analysts, assistant 101 behavior analysts, registered behavior technicians, and 102 supervising entities. 103 (2)âNETWORK ADEQUACY AND WORKFORCE STABILITY.â 104 (a)âThe agency shall consider the impact of credentialing 105 delays, administrative bottlenecks, and moratoria on providers 106 when evaluating network adequacy for applied behavior analysis 107 services. 108 (b)âManaged care plans shall take reasonable steps to 109 support workforce retention and recruitment, particularly in 110 rural and underserved areas. 111 (3)âCREDENTIALING AND RECREDENTIALING.â 112 (a)âManaged care plans shall use a standardized, 113 consolidated credentialing process for applied behavior analysis 114 providers and may not require duplicative submissions of 115 identical documents to multiple portals or entities. 116 (b)âManaged care plans shall notify a provider of all 117 credentialing deficiencies in a single, comprehensive notice 118 within 15 calendar days after receipt of an application. 119 (c)âInitial credentialing and activation must be completed 120 within 60 calendar days after receipt of a clean application. 121 (d)âManaged care plans may not require a provider to 122 undergo the full credentialing process to recredential solely 123 due to a gap in enrollment if the providerâs licensure and 124 national certification remained continuously active during such 125 gap. 126 (4)âPROVIDER ROSTERS AND MORATORIA.â 127 (a)âA managed care plan may not impose a moratorium on 128 applied behavior analysis service providers unless the plan 129 demonstrates to the agency, in writing, that: 130 1.âNetwork adequacy standards are fully met in all affected 131 geographic areas; and 132 2.âThe moratorium is narrowly tailored, time-limited, and 133 necessary to address a documented administrative or compliance 134 issue. 135 (b)âIf the agency approves a moratorium, the managed care 136 plan must provide written notice to the providers and 137 recipients, specifying a definite end date for the moratorium, 138 and provide an exception process for underserved or rural areas. 139 (c)âA managed care plan may not use a moratorium to delay 140 or deny continuity of care for existing recipients. 141 (5)âCONTINUITY OF CARE.â 142 (a)âA managed care plan shall provide a continuity-of-care 143 period of no less than 120 days for applied behavior analysis 144 services for a recipient newly enrolled in the plan or 145 transitioning providers. 146 (b)âDuring the continuity-of-care period, prior 147 authorizations must be honored and backdated as necessary and 148 may not be terminated or reduced due to credentialing, 149 rostering, or other administrative delays. 150 (c)âServices rendered during and immediately after the 151 continuity-of-care period must be reimbursed in accordance with 152 prompt payment requirements. 153 (6)âINDIVIDUALIZED MEDICAL NECESSITY; AGE-BASED 154 BENCHMARKS.â 155 (a)âAny determinations involving coverage and utilization 156 review for applied behavior analysis services must be based on 157 individualized medical necessity of the recipient. 158 (b)âAge-based hour targets or incentive benchmarks may not 159 be used as fixed caps, minimums, or substitutes for 160 individualized clinical determinations. 161 (7)âUTILIZATION MANAGEMENT.â 162 (a)âAuthorization and utilization review decisions for 163 applied behavior analysis services must be conducted by 164 reviewers with demonstrated training and experience in applied 165 behavior analysis. 166 (b)âA managed care plan may not require a reauthorization 167 cycle of less than 90 days absent a documented material change 168 in the recipientâs clinical condition. 169 (c)âRequests for updated diagnostic evaluations or 170 assessments may not be imposed more frequently than clinically 171 indicated. 172 (d)âPeer-to-peer reviews must be scheduled and conducted 173 within required timeframes, and a failure attributable to the 174 managed care plan may not reset or delay the timeframe for 175 authorization. 176 (8)âCLAIMS PAYMENT.â 177 (a)âManaged care plans shall pay clean claims for applied 178 behavior analysis services in accordance with prompt payment 179 requirements. 180 (b)âFor any denial or partial payment, managed care plans 181 shall provide an explanation of benefits, including clear, code 182 specific, and unit-level reasons for the denial or partial 183 payment. 184 (c)âManaged care plans may not issue recoupment or 185 overpayment demands based solely on administrative or system 186 errors without documented provider fault. 187 (9)âADMINISTRATIVE COMMUNICATIONS.â 188 (a)âManaged care plans shall maintain stable electronic 189 portals capable of providing confirmation of receipt of 190 documentation submitted by providers. 191 (b)âManaged care plans shall give providers access to a 192 defined escalation pathway with decisionmaking authority for 193 issues involving credentialing, utilization management, and 194 claims resolution. 195 (c)âAny notice a managed care plan sends to a provider or 196 recipient must be written in plain language and clearly describe 197 applicable timelines, next steps, and appeal rights. 198 (10)âPRIVACY AND SECURITY.âManaged care plans shall 199 implement safeguards to prevent the misdirection of protected 200 health information and shall maintain clear breach-response 201 procedures and approved secure transmission methods. 202 (11)âENFORCEMENT.âThe agency shall amend existing managed 203 care plan contracts as needed to provide for enforcement of this 204 section, including through existing contract remedies, such as 205 corrective action plans, liquidated damages, or sanctions. 206 (12)âRULES.âThe agency may adopt rules to implement this 207 section. 208 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.